Maine, session 132, LD1824.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§3, ¶U, as amended by PL 2023, c. 618, §1, is further
amended to read:
U. Records provided by a railroad company pursuant to Title 23, section 7311,
subsection 5 and records describing hazardous materials transported by the railroad
company in this State, the routes of hazardous materials shipments and the frequency
of hazardous materials operations on those routes that are in the possession of a state
or local emergency management entity or law enforcement agency, fire department or
other first responder, except that records related to a train carrying hazardous materials
that has derailed at any point from a main line train track or related to a discharge of
hazardous materials transported by a railroad company that poses a threat to public
health, safety and welfare are subject to public disclosure after that discharge. For the
purposes of this paragraph, "hazardous material" has the same meaning as set forth in
49 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 105.5; and
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§3, ¶V, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 118, §3, is amended
to read:
V. Participant application materials and other personal information obtained or
maintained by a municipality or other public entity in administering a community well-
being check program, except that a participant's personal information, including health
information, may be made available to first responders only as necessary to implement
the program. For the purposes of this paragraph, "community well-being check
program" means a voluntary program that involves daily, or regular, contact with a
participant and, when contact cannot be established, sends first responders to the
participant's residence to check on the participant's well-being.; and
Sec. 3. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§3, ¶W is enacted to read:
W. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 23, section 7311 to the contrary, during the
course of an investigation of an accident resulting in a fatality involving a railroad or
railroad line, reports of a law enforcement agency regarding that accident and all
records of communication between the law enforcement agency and a railroad
company employee involved in that accident. A law enforcement agency that responds
to the accident shall maintain such reports and records in a manner that ensures
confidentiality of the reports and records, except that the reports and records may be
accessible at all reasonable times, upon written request, to:
(1) A railroad company responsible for the railroad or railroad line on which the
accident occurred;
(2) A railroad company whose employee is identified in a report or record; and
(3) Any other person authorized by judicial order to obtain the reports or records
under this paragraph if access to the report or record is necessary in the
performance of the person's duties.
The reports and records under this paragraph must be accessible at all reasonable times,
upon written or e-mail request to law enforcement agencies, district attorneys and
assistant district attorneys.
Page 1 - 132LR1288(01)

For the purposes of this paragraph, "railroad" has the same meaning as in Title 23,
section 5001, subsection 1; "railroad company" has the same meaning as in Title 23,
section 5001, subsection 2; and "railroad line" has the same meaning as in Title 23,
section 7152, subsection 3.